California statutes. Vehicle Code
 interlock device in another state as an indication that the certification requirements are not met, if either of the following apply:

(i) The denial of certification, suspension or revocation of certification, or decertification in another state constitutes a violation by the manufacturer of Article 2.55 (commencing with Section 125.00) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) The denial of certification for an ignition interlock device in another state was due to a failure of an ignition interlock device to meet the standards adopted by the regulation set forth in clause (i), specifically Sections 1 and 2 of the model specification for breath alcohol ignition interlock devices, as published by notice in the Federal Register, Vol. 57, No. 67, Tuesday, April 7, 1992, on pages 11774 to 11787, inclusive, or the Model Specifications for Breath
 Alcohol Ignition Interlock Devices, as published by notice in the Federal Register, Vol. 78, No. 89, Wednesday, May 8, 2013, on pages 25489 to 26867, inclusive.

(C) Failure to continue to meet certification requirements shall result in suspension or revocation of certification of ignition interlock devices.

(b) (1) A manufacturer shall not furnish an installer, service center, technician, or consumer with technology or information that allows a device to be used in a manner that is contrary to the purpose for which it is certified.

(2) Upon a violation of paragraph (1), the department shall suspend or revoke the certification of the ignition interlock device that is the subject of that violation.

(c) An installer, service center,
 or technician shall not tamper with, change, or alter the functionality of the device from its certified criteria.

(d) The department shall utilize information from an independent, accredited (ISO/IEC 17025) laboratory to certify ignition interlock devices of the manufacturer or manufacturer’s agent, in accordance with the guidelines. The cost of certification shall be borne by the manufacturers of ignition interlock devices. If the certification of a device is suspended or revoked, the manufacturer of the device shall be responsible for, and shall bear the cost of, the removal of the device and the replacement of a certified device of the manufacturer or another manufacturer.

(e) A model of ignition interlock device shall not be certified unless it meets the accuracy requirements and specifications provided in the guidelines adopted by the National Highway Traffic Safety
 Administration.

(f) All manufacturers of ignition interlock devices that meet the requirements of subdivision (e) and are certified in a manner approved by the department, who intend to sell the devices in this state, first shall apply to the department on forms provided by that department. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount not to exceed the amount necessary to cover the costs incurred by the department in carrying out this section.

(g) The department shall ensure that standard forms and procedures are developed for documenting decisions and compliance and communicating results to relevant agencies. These forms shall include all of the following:

(1) An “Option to Install,” to be sent by the department to repeat offenders along with the mandatory order of suspension or revocation. This shall
 include the alternatives available for early license reinstatement with the installation of an ignition interlock device and shall be accompanied by a toll-free telephone number for each manufacturer of a certified ignition interlock device. Information regarding approved installation locations shall be provided to drivers by manufacturers with ignition interlock devices that have been certified in accordance with this section.

(2) A “Verification of Installation” to be returned to the department by the reinstating offender upon application for reinstatement. Copies shall be provided for the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s agent.

(3) A “Notice of Noncompliance” and procedures to ensure continued use of the ignition interlock device during the restriction period and to ensure compliance with maintenance requirements. The maintenance period shall be standardized at 60 days to
 maximize monitoring checks for equipment tampering.

(h) Every manufacturer and manufacturer’s agent certified by the department to provide ignition interlock devices shall adopt fee schedules that provide for the payment of the costs of the device by applicants in amounts commensurate with the applicant’s ability to pay.

(i) A person who manufactures, installs, services, or repairs, or otherwise deals in ignition interlock devices shall not disclose, sell, or transfer to a third party any individually identifiable information pertaining to individuals who are required by law to install an ignition interlock device on a vehicle that the individual owns or operates, except to the
 extent necessary to confirm or deny that an individual has complied with ignition interlock device installation and maintenance requirements.

(j) This section shall become operative January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 22) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 16.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13386.

(a) (1) The department shall certify or cause to be certified ignition interlock devices required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 23575) of Chapter 2 of Division 11.5 and publish a list of approved devices.

(2) (A) The department shall ensure that ignition interlock devices that have been certified according to the requirements of this section continue to meet certification requirements. The department may periodically require manufacturers to indicate in writing whether the devices continue to meet certification requirements.

(B) The department may use denial of certification, suspension or revocation of certification, or decertification of an ignition
 interlock device in another state as an indication that the certification requirements are not met, if either of the following apply:

(i) The denial of certification, suspension or revocation of certification, or decertification in another state constitutes a violation by the manufacturer of Article 2.55 (commencing with Section 125.00) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) The denial of certification for an ignition interlock device in another state was due to a failure of an ignition interlock device to meet the standards adopted by the regulation set forth in clause (i), specifically Sections 1 and 2 of the model specification for breath alcohol ignition interlock devices, as published by notice in the Federal Register, Vol. 57, No. 67, Tuesday, April 7, 1992, on pages 11774 to 11787, inclusive, or the model specifications for breath
 alcohol ignition interlock devices, as published by notice in the Federal Register, Vol. 78, No. 89, Wednesday, May 8, 2013, on pages 25489 to 26867, inclusive.

(C) Failure to continue to meet certification requirements shall result in suspension or revocation of certification of ignition interlock devices.

(b) (1) A manufacturer shall not furnish an installer, service center, technician, or consumer with technology or information that allows a device to be used in a manner that is contrary to the purpose for which it is certified.

(2) Upon a violation of paragraph (1), the department shall suspend or revoke the certification of the ignition interlock device that is the subject of that violation.

(c) An installer, service center,
 or technician shall not tamper with, change, or alter the functionality of the device from its certified criteria.

(d) The department shall utilize information from an independent, accredited (ISO/IEC 17025) laboratory to certify ignition interlock devices of the manufacturer or manufacturer’s agent, in accordance with the guidelines. The cost of certification shall be borne by the manufacturers of ignition interlock devices. If the certification of a device is suspended or revoked, the manufacturer of the device shall be responsible for, and shall bear the cost of, the removal of the device and the replacement of a certified device of the manufacturer or another manufacturer.

(e) A model of ignition interlock device shall not be certified unless it meets the accuracy requirements and specifications provided in the guidelines adopted by the National Highway Traffic Safety
 Administration.

(f) All manufacturers of ignition interlock devices that meet the requirements of subdivision (e) and are certified in a manner approved by the department, who intend to market the devices in this state, first shall apply to the department on forms provided by that department. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount not to exceed the amount necessary to cover the reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out this section.

(g) The department shall ensure that standard forms and procedures are developed for documenting decisions and compliance and communicating results to relevant agencies. These forms shall include all of the following:

(1) An “Option to Install,” to be sent by the department to all offenders along with the mandatory order of suspension or revocation.
 This shall include the alternatives available for early license reinstatement with the installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device and shall be accompanied by a toll-free telephone number for each manufacturer of a certified ignition interlock device. Information regarding approved installation locations shall be provided to drivers by manufacturers with ignition interlock devices that have been certified in accordance with this section.

(2) A “Verification of Installation” to be returned to the department by the offender upon application for reinstatement. Copies shall be provided for the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s agent.

(3) A “Notice of Noncompliance” and procedures to ensure continued use of the ignition interlock device during the restriction period and to ensure compliance with maintenance requirements. The maintenance period shall be
 standardized at 60 days to maximize monitoring checks for equipment tampering.

(h) The department shall develop rules under which every manufacturer and manufacturer’s agent certified by the department to provide ignition interlock devices shall provide a fee schedule to the department of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, stating the standard charges for installation, service and maintenance, and removal of the manufacturer’s device, and shall develop a form to be signed by an authorized representative of the manufacturer pursuant to which the manufacturer agrees to provide functioning, certified ignition interlock devices to applicants at the costs described in subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3. The form shall contain an acknowledgment that the failure of the manufacturer, its agents, or authorized installers to comply with subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 shall result in suspension or revocation of the
 department’s approval for the manufacturer to market ignition interlock devices in this state.

(i) A person who manufactures, installs, services, or repairs, or otherwise deals in ignition interlock devices shall not disclose, sell, or transfer to a third party any individually identifiable information pertaining to individuals who are required by law to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle that
 the individual operates, except to the extent necessary to confirm or deny that an individual has complied with ignition interlock device installation and maintenance requirements.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 15.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 16 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

13388.

(a) If a peace officer lawfully detains a person under 21 years of age who is driving a motor vehicle, and the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person is in violation of Section 23136, the officer shall request that the person take a preliminary alcohol screening test to determine the presence of alcohol in the person, if a preliminary alcohol screening test device is immediately available. If a preliminary alcohol screening test device is not immediately available, the officer may request the person to submit to chemical testing of his or her blood, breath, or urine, conducted pursuant to Section 23612.

(b) If the person refuses to take, or fails to complete, the preliminary alcohol screening test or refuses to take or fails to complete a chemical test if a preliminary alcohol device is not immediately available, or if the person takes the preliminary alcohol screening test and that test reveals a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, or if the results of a chemical test reveal a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, the officer shall proceed as follows:

(1) The officer, acting on behalf of the department, shall serve the person with a notice of an order of suspension of the person’s driving privilege.

(2) The officer shall take possession of any driver’s license issued by this state which is held by the person. When the officer takes possession of a valid driver’s license, the officer shall issue, on behalf of the department, a temporary driver’s license. The temporary driver’s license shall be an endorsement on the notice of the order of suspension and shall be valid for 30 days from the date of issuance, or until receipt of the order of suspension from the department, whichever occurs first.

(3) The officer immediately shall forward a copy of the completed notice of order of suspension form, and any driver’s license taken into possession under paragraph (2), with the report required by Section 13380, to the department. For the purposes of this paragraph, “immediately” means on or before the end of the fifth ordinary business day after the notice of order of suspension was served.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a preliminary alcohol screening test device is an instrument designed and used to measure the presence of alcohol in a person based on a breath sample.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13389.

(a) If a peace officer lawfully detains a person previously convicted of Section 23152 or 23153 who is driving a motor vehicle, while the person is on probation for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, and the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person is in violation of Section 23154, the officer shall request that the person take a preliminary alcohol screening test to determine the presence of alcohol in the person, if a preliminary alcohol screening test device is immediately available. If a preliminary alcohol screening test device is not immediately available, the officer may request the person to submit to chemical testing of his or her blood, breath, or urine, conducted pursuant to Section 23612.

(b) If the person refuses to take, or fails to complete, the preliminary alcohol screening test or refuses to take or fails to complete a chemical test if a preliminary alcohol device is not immediately available, or if the person takes the preliminary alcohol screening test and that test reveals a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, the officer shall proceed as follows:

(1) The officer, acting on behalf of the department, shall serve the person with a notice of an order of suspension of the person’s driving privilege.

(2) (A) The officer shall take possession of any driver’s license issued by this state that is held by the person. When the officer takes possession of a valid driver’s license, the officer shall issue, on behalf of the department, a temporary driver’s license.

(B) The temporary driver’s license shall be an endorsement on the notice of the order of suspension and shall be valid for 30 days from the date of issuance, or until receipt of the order of suspension from the department, whichever occurs first.

(3) (A) The officer shall immediately forward a copy of the completed notice of order of suspension form, and any driver’s license taken into possession under paragraph (2), with the report required by Section 13380, to the department.

(B) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), “immediately” means on or before the end of the fifth ordinary business day after the notice of order of suspension was served.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a preliminary alcohol screening test device is an instrument designed and used to measure the presence of alcohol in a person based on a breath sample.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative January 1, 2009, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

13390.

(a) A temporary license issued pursuant to Section 13382 or 13389 shall contain a notice that the person may be able to regain driving privileges with the installation of an ignition interlock device, that financial assistance may be available for that purpose, and a contact for obtaining more information regarding the ignition interlock program.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date
 is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 17.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13392.

Any person whose license is suspended or delayed issuance pursuant to Section 13388 shall pay to the department, in addition to any other fees required for the reissuance, return, or issuance of a driver’s license, one hundred dollars ($100) for the reissuance, return, or issuance of his or her driver’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Procedure [13550. - 13559.]

13550.

Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this code makes mandatory the revocation or suspension by the department of the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle, the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle is suspended or revoked until the department takes the action required by this code, and the court in which the conviction is had shall require the surrender to it of the driver’s license or temporary permit issued to the person convicted and the court shall within 10 days after the conviction forward the same with the required report of the conviction to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13551.

(a) Whenever the department revokes or suspends the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle, the revocation or suspension shall apply to all driver’s licenses held by that person, and, unless previously surrendered to the court, all of those licenses shall be surrendered to the department, or, pursuant to Section 13388, 23612, or 13382, to a peace officer on behalf of the department. Whenever the department cancels a driver’s license, the license shall be surrendered to the department. All suspended licenses shall be retained by the department. The department shall return the license to the licensee, or may issue the person a new license upon the expiration of the period of suspension or revocation, if the person is otherwise eligible for a driver’s license.

(b) The department shall return the license to the licensee, or may issue the person a new license, whenever the department determines that the grounds for suspension, revocation, or cancellation did not exist at the time the action was taken, if the person is otherwise eligible for a driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 3.18.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.

(a) The privileges of a nonresident to operate vehicles in this state may be suspended or revoked under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as the privileges of a resident driver.

(b) Any nonresident, whether or not licensed to drive in a foreign jurisdiction, who operates a motor vehicle upon a highway after his privilege of operating a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended or revoked is in violation of Section 14601 or 14601.1.

(c) Whenever the department revokes or suspends the privileges of a nonresident to operate vehicles in this state, it shall send a certified copy of the order to the proper authorities in the state wherein the person is a resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.

Whenever a court or the department suspends or revokes the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle and the person does not hold a valid driver’s license, or has never applied for or received a driver’s license in this State, the person shall be subject to any and all penalties and disabilities provided in this code for a violation of the terms and conditions of a suspension or revocation of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13555.

A termination of probation and dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4 of, or a dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4a of, or relief granted pursuant to Section 1203.425 of, the Penal Code does not affect any revocation or suspension of the privilege of the person convicted to drive a motor vehicle under this chapter. Such person’s prior conviction shall be considered a conviction for the purpose of revoking or suspending or otherwise limiting such privilege on the ground of two or more
 convictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 578, Sec. 10.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13556.

(a) Unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, no suspension of a license by the department shall be for a longer period than six months, except that the department may suspend a license for a maximum period of 12 months in those cases when a discretionary revocation would otherwise be authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any discretionary suspension, the ending of which is dependent upon an action by the person suspended and which has been in effect for eight years, may be ended at the election of the department.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, a suspension based upon a physical or mental condition shall continue until evidence satisfactory to the department establishes that the cause for which the action was taken has been removed or no longer renders the person incapable of operating a motor vehicle safely.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13557.

(a) The department shall review the determination made pursuant to Section 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.2 relating to a person who has received a notice of an order of suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to Section 13353, 13353.1, 13353.2, 13382, or 23612,. The department shall consider the sworn report submitted by the peace officer pursuant to Section 23612 or 13380 and any other evidence accompanying the report.

(b) (1) If the department determines in the review of a determination made under Section 13353 or 13353.1, by a preponderance of the evidence, all of the following facts, the department shall sustain the order of suspension or revocation:

(A) The peace officer had reasonable cause to believe that the person had been driving a motor vehicle in violation of Section 23136, 23140, 23152, 23153, or 23154.

(B) The person was placed under arrest or, if the alleged violation was of Section 23136, that the person was lawfully detained.

(C) The person refused or failed to complete the chemical test or tests after being requested by a peace officer.

(D) Except for the persons described in Section 23612 who are incapable of refusing, the person had been told that his or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle would be suspended or revoked if he or she refused to submit to, and complete, the required testing.

(2) If the department
 determines, by a preponderance of the evidence, that any of the facts required under paragraph (1) were not proven, the department shall rescind the order of suspension or revocation and, if the person is otherwise eligible, return or reissue the person’s driver’s license pursuant to Section 13551. The determination of the department upon administrative review is final unless a hearing is requested pursuant to Section 13558.

(3) If the department determines in the review of a determination made under Section 13353.2, by the preponderance of the evidence, all of the following facts, the department shall sustain the order of suspension or revocation, or if the person is under 21 years of age and does not yet have a driver’s license, the department shall delay issuance of that license for one year:

(A) The peace officer had reasonable cause to believe that the person had been driving
 a motor vehicle in violation of Section 23136, 23140, 23152, 23153, or 23154.

(B) The person was placed under arrest or, if the alleged violation was of Section 23136, the person was lawfully detained.

(C) The person was driving a motor vehicle under any of the following circumstances:

(i) When the person had 0.08 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(ii) When the person was under 21 years of age and had 0.05 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(iii) When the person was under 21 years of age and had a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, as measured by a preliminary alcohol screening test, or other chemical test.

(iv) When the person was driving a vehicle that requires a commercial driver’s license and the person had 0.04 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(v) When the person was on probation for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 and had a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, as measured by a preliminary alcohol screening test or other chemical test.

(4) If the department determines that any of those facts required under paragraph (3) were not proven by the preponderance of the evidence, the department shall rescind the order of suspension or revocation and, if the person is otherwise eligible, return or reissue the person’s driver’s license pursuant to Section 13551. For persons under 21 years of age, the determination of the department pursuant to paragraph (3) is final unless a
 hearing is requested within 10 days of the determination, which hearing shall be conducted according to Section 13558. For persons over 21 years of age, the determination of the department upon administrative review is final unless a hearing is requested pursuant to Section 13558.

(c) The department shall make the determination upon administrative review before the effective date of the order of suspension or revocation.

(d) The administrative review does not stay the suspension or revocation of a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle. If the department is unable to make a determination on administrative review within the time limit in subdivision (c), the department shall stay the effective date of the order of suspension or revocation pending the determination and, if the person’s driver’s license has been taken by the peace officer pursuant to Section 13382, 13388,
 13389, or 23612, the department shall notify the person before the expiration date of the temporary permit issued pursuant to Section 13382, 13388, 13389, or 23612, or the expiration date of any previous extension issued pursuant to this subdivision, in a form that permits the person to establish to any peace officer that his or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle is not suspended or revoked.

(e) A person may request and be granted a hearing pursuant to Section 13558 without first receiving the results of an administrative review pursuant to this section. After receiving a request for a hearing, the department is not required to conduct an administrative review of the same matter pursuant to this section.

(f) A determination of facts by the department under this section has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of
 those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 307.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13558.

(a) Any person, who has received a notice of an order of suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to Section 13353, 13353.1, 13353.2, 13388, 23612, or 13382 or a notice pursuant to Section 13557, may request a hearing on the matter pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(b) If the person wishes to have a hearing before the effective date of the order of suspension or revocation, the request for a hearing shall be made within 10 days of the receipt of the notice of the order of suspension or revocation. The hearing shall be held at a place designated by the
 department as close as practicable to the place where the arrest occurred, unless the parties agree to a different location. Any evidence at the hearing shall not be limited to the evidence presented at an administrative review pursuant to Section 13557.

(c) (1) The only issues at the hearing on an order of suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.1 shall be those facts listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 13557. Notwithstanding Section 14106, the period of suspension or revocation specified in Section 13353 or 13353.1 shall not be reduced and, notwithstanding Section 14105.5, the effective date of the order of suspension or revocation shall not be stayed pending review at a hearing pursuant to this section.

(2) The only issues at the hearing on an order of suspension pursuant to Section 13353.2 shall be those facts listed
 in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 13557. Notwithstanding Section 14106, the period of suspension specified in Section 13353.3 shall not be reduced.

(d) The department shall hold the administrative hearing before the effective date of the order of suspension or revocation if the request for the hearing is postmarked or received by the department on or before 10 days after the person’s receipt of the service of the notice of the order of suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 13353.2, 13388, 23612, or 13382.

(e) A request for an administrative hearing does not stay the suspension or revocation of a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle. If the department does not conduct an administrative hearing and make a determination after an administrative hearing within the time limit in subdivision (d), the department shall stay the effective date of the order of
 suspension or revocation pending the determination and, if the person’s driver’s license has been taken by the peace officer pursuant to Section 13388, 23612, or 13382, the department shall notify the person before the expiration date of the temporary permit issued pursuant to Section 13388, 23612, or 13382, or the expiration date of any previous extension issued pursuant to this subdivision, provided the person is otherwise eligible, in a form that permits the person to establish to any peace officer that his or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle is not suspended or revoked.

(f) The department shall give written notice of its determination pursuant to Section 14105. If the department determines, upon a hearing of the matter, to suspend or revoke the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle, notwithstanding the term of any temporary permit issued pursuant to Section 13388, 23612, or 13382, the temporary permit shall be revoked and
 the suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall become effective five days after notice is given. If the department sustains the order of suspension or revocation, the department shall include notice that the person has a right to review by the court pursuant to Section 13559.

(g) A determination of facts by the department upon a hearing pursuant to this section has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 27.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13559.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14400 or 14401, within 30 days of the issuance of the notice of determination of the department sustaining an order of suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle after the hearing pursuant to Section 13558, the person may file a petition for review of the order in the court of competent jurisdiction in the person’s county of residence. The filing of a petition for judicial review shall not stay the order of suspension or revocation. The review shall be on the record of the hearing and the court shall not consider other evidence. If the court finds that the department exceeded its constitutional or statutory authority, made an erroneous interpretation of the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination which is not supported by the evidence in the record, the court may order the department to rescind the order of suspension or revocation and return, or reissue a new license to, the person.

(b) A finding by the court after a review pursuant to this section shall have no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 431, Sec. 12.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Investigation and Hearing [13800. - 14401.]



  ARTICLE 1. Investigation and Re-examination [13800. - 13802.]

13800.

The department may conduct an investigation to determine whether the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle should be suspended or revoked or whether terms or conditions of probation should be imposed upon receiving information or upon a showing by its records:

(a) That the licensee has been involved as a driver in an accident causing death or personal injury or serious damage to property.

(b) That the licensee has
 been involved in three or more accidents within a period of 12 consecutive months.

(c) That the person in three consecutive years has committed three or more offenses that have resulted in convictions involving the consumption of an alcoholic beverage or drug, or both, while operating a motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, offenses under Section 23103.5, 23152, 23153, 23222, or 23224; has been involved in three or more crashes in which the crash reports show that the person was driving and had consumed alcoholic beverages or drugs, or both; or had any combination of three or more of those offenses and crashes.

(d) That the licensee is a reckless, negligent, or incompetent driver of a motor vehicle.

(e) That the licensee has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of their driver’s license.

(f) That any ground exists for which a license might be refused. The receipt by the department of an abstract of the record of conviction of any offense involving the use or possession of narcotic controlled substances under Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code shall be a sufficient basis for an investigation by the department to determine whether grounds exist for which a license might be refused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 3.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13801.

In addition to the investigation, the department may require the re-examination of the licensee, and shall give 10 days’ written notice of the time and place thereof. If the licensee refuses or fails to submit to the re-examination, the department may peremptorily suspend the driving privilege of the person until such time as the licensee shall have submitted to re-examination. The suspension shall be effective upon notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13802.

In applying the provisions of Section 13800 the department shall give due consideration to the amount of use or mileage traveled in the operation of a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice [13950. - 13954.]

13950.

Whenever the department determines upon investigation or re-examination that any of the grounds for re-examination are true, or that the safety of the person investigated or re-examined or other persons upon the highways requires such action, and it proposes to revoke or suspend the driving privilege of the person or proposes to impose terms of probation on his driving privilege, notice and an opportunity to be heard shall be given before taking the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13951.

Whenever the department proposes to refuse to issue or renew a driver’s license, it shall notify the applicant of such fact and give him an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13952.

The notice shall contain a statement setting forth the proposed action and the grounds therefor, and notify the person of his right to a hearing as provided in this chapter, or the department, at the time it gives notice of its intention to act may set the date of hearing, giving 10 days’ notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

13953.
